Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 8. General Provisions.

Sec. 10.13.850.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.860.
Application of Administrative Procedure Act to proceedings.

A proceeding under AS

10.13.830

is subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, other proceedings and actions under this chapter are exempt from AS 44.62.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.870.
Appeals.

A final order of an administrative proceeding under AS

10.13.710

—

10.13.760

,

10.13.800

,

10.13.810

, or

10.13.830

may be appealed to the superior court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.880.
Application of law under which licensee incorporated.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of the law under which a licensee is incorporated apply to the licensee. If a provision of the licensee’s incorporating law conflicts with a provision of this chapter, this chapter controls.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.890.
Associates.

In AS

10.13.300

—

10.13.320

and

10.13.630

—

10.13.660

, a person who is an associate within six months before or after a licensee provides financing assistance shall be considered to be an associate as of the date the licensee provides the assistance.

If a licensee, in order to protect the licensee’s interests, designates a person to serve as a director of, officer of, or in a management capacity of a business to which the licensee provides financial assistance, the person may not, on that account, be considered to be an associate under AS

10.13.300

—

10.13.310

or

10.13.630

—

10.13.660

. This subsection does not apply if the person has, directly or indirectly, another financial interest in the business or if the person, at any time before the licensee provides the financing assistance, served as a director of, officer of, or in another capacity in the management of the business for a period of 30 days or more.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.900.
Other licenses.

A corporation that is licensed under this chapter may apply for and be issued a license under another law of the state, federal government, or of another state in the United States unless the transaction of business by the corporation as a licensee under the other license would violate this chapter or would be contrary to the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.910.
Exemption.

A licensee is not subject to the provisions of AS 06.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.920.
Department authority regarding conflicts of interest.

The provisions of this chapter relating to conflicts of interest do not limit the authority of the department to determine that an act involves a conflict of interest and is therefore an unsafe or unsound act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.930.
Confidentiality.

The commissioner, deputies, and other employees of the department may not disclose information acquired by them in the discharge of their duties under this chapter except to the extent disclosure of the information is required by law, other than the public records provisions of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.220

, or is required by court order.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department may disclose information that is confidential under (a) of this section if the department determines that disclosure of the information is necessary to promote the public interest. This subsection does not authorize the disclosure of information acquired by the department in the course of an examination of a licensee.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 26 SLA 2018.]

A BIDCO may provide to a current or prospective creditor or shareholder of the BIDCO a copy of an examination report on the BIDCO made by the department under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 2 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 26 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.220

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.220

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.220

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 13, 2018, repealed (c).

Sec. 10.13.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“affiliate” means, if used with respect to a nonnatural person, a person who controls the nonnatural person, who is controlled by the nonnatural person, or who is controlled by a person who also controls the nonnatural person;

“associate” means, if used with respect to a licensee,

a controlling person, director, or officer of the licensee;

a director, officer, or partner of a person referred to in (A) of this paragraph;

a person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a person referred to in (A) of this paragraph, directly or indirectly through an intermediary;

a close relative of a person referred to in (A) of this paragraph; in this subparagraph, “close relative” means a parent, child, sibling, or spouse, or a relative of the same degree through marriage;

a person of which a person referred to in (A) — (D) of this paragraph is a director or officer;

a person in which a person referred to in (A) — (D) of this paragraph, or a combination of the persons acting in concert, owns or controls, directly or indirectly, a 20 percent or greater equity interest;

“BIDCO” means a corporation that is licensed under this chapter to provide financial and management assistance to businesses;

“business” means a person who transacts or proposes to transact business on a regular and continual basis;

“control” means, if used with respect to a specific person, the power to direct or cause the direction of, directly or indirectly through an intermediary, the management and policies of the person, through the ownership of voting interests, by contract other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or by other means; a natural person is not considered to control another person solely because the natural person is a director, officer, or employee of the other person; a person is rebuttably presumed to control a corporation if the person directly or indirectly owns of record, holds beneficially with power to vote, or holds proxies with discretionary authority to vote, 20 percent or more of the then outstanding voting securities issued by a corporation;

“controlling person” means, if used with respect to a specific person, a person who controls the specific person, directly or indirectly through an intermediary;

“corporate name” means the name of a corporation in its articles of incorporation;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“insolvent” means not paying debts in the ordinary course of business, not paying debts as they become due, or liabilities exceeding assets;

“interests of the licensee” includes the interests of the shareholders of the licensee;

“license” means a license issued under this chapter;

“licensee” means a corporation that is licensed under this chapter;

“officer” means

with respect to a corporation, a person appointed or designated as an officer of the corporation by or under applicable law or the corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws, or a person who performs with respect to the corporation the functions usually performed by an officer of a corporation;

with respect to a specific person other than a natural person or a corporation, a person who performs for the specific person the functions usually performed by an officer of a corporation for a corporation;

“order” means an approval, consent, authorization, exemption, denial, prohibition, or requirement applicable to a specific case and issued by the department, including a license condition and an agreement made by a person with the department under this chapter;

“person” includes a government and an agency of a government; when used with respect to acquiring control of or controlling a specific person, “person” includes a combination of two or more persons acting in concert;

“principal shareholder” means a person who owns, directly or indirectly, of record or beneficially, securities representing 10 percent or more of the outstanding voting securities of a corporation;

“subject person” means

a controlling person, subsidiary, or affiliate of a licensee;

a director, officer, or employee of a licensee or of a controlling person, subsidiary, or affiliate of a licensee;

another person who participates in the conduct of the business of a licensee; or

if used with respect to a licensee, a company or business of which the licensee holds control under AS

10.13.260

—

10.13.280

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 10.13.995.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska BIDCO Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)